Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 4 General Offenses and Penalties

Cross references. —

As to throwing burning substances from vehicles, see §

6-3-107

.

Stated

in

Dotson v. State, 712 P.2d 365,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 244 to 426; 8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic § 427 et seq.

Miranda warnings: right of motorist stopped by police officers for traffic offense to be informed at that time of his federal constitutional rights under Miranda v. Arizona, 25 ALR3d 1076.

§ 31-4-101.
General prohibitions.

No person shall knowingly operate, nor shall an owner knowingly permit to be operated, upon any highway any vehicle:

Unless a valid certificate of title, certificate of registration and license plates or temporary permits have been issued for the vehicle except as otherwise provided by this act;

Unless valid license plates or permits issued for the vehicle are displayed on the vehicle as provided by this act except as otherwise provided by this act;

With license plates, validation stickers or license permits altered, mutilated or obscured so as to prevent the license plate number from being easily read.

No person shall alter or mutilate any valid license plate, sticker or permit.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 116, § 2.

No person shall sell or transfer his interest in a vehicle for which a certificate of title is required unless he has obtained a certificate and assigns his interest on the title except as otherwise provided by this act.

No person shall operate a vehicle in any manner with an expired or improper registration, permit, decal or any other department approved registration upon any highway or other publicly maintained roadway in this state.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1991, ch. 116, § 2; 2009, ch. 16, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, deleted “or nontransferable certificate under W.S. 31-2-102(a)(iii)” following “title” in (a)(i); and added (e).

Cross references. —

As to replacement of mutilated or destroyed registration, plates or stickers, see §

31-2-212

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Cited in

Clay v. State, 2016 WY 55, 372 P.3d 195,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

Dotson v. State, 712 P.2d 365,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 31-4-102.
Falsifications; alterations, forgery or counterfeiting; penalties.

No person shall knowingly make a false statement in any application or other document required under this act.

No person shall alter with fraudulent intent, forge or counterfeit any certificate of title, certificate of registration, or assignment of a certificate of title. No person shall hold or use any certificate of title or certificate of registration knowing the same to have been altered, forged or counterfeited.

Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1991, ch. 116, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to forgery generally, see §§

6-3-602

and

6-3-603

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-4-103.
Failure to maintain liability coverage; penalties; exceptions.

No owner of a motor vehicle currently required to be registered or which is required to be registered within a period of time, shall operate or permit the operation of his motor vehicle without having in full force and effect a motor vehicle liability policy in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-405(b), a bond in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi) or, when applicable, in amounts as required by W.S. 31-20-107(b) and (c). Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or both. For a second or subsequent violation of this subsection, the judge shall require the defendant to deliver the registration and license plates of the vehicle involved to the county treasurer for the county where the citation was issued, and the registration and license plates shall be held by the county treasurer until such time as the judge determines that the defendant has met all obligations imposed by law. Excusable neglect or mistake by another is a defense for any violation of this subsection. If evidence of excusable neglect or mistake by another is presented and the defendant is convicted, the court may consider this evidence in imposing a penalty under this subsection. The judge may suspend part or all of the sentence under this subsection and place the defendant on probation subject to conditions imposed by the judge which shall include a condition that the defendant shall deliver the registration and license plates of the vehicle involved to the county treasurer for the county where the citation was issued. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle owned by a nonresident and registered in a state requiring insurance if a vehicle insurance policy meeting requirements of the laws and regulations of that state is in effect or unless it otherwise complies with the laws of that state concerning compulsory financial responsibility. The department shall report any violation of this subsection to the motor vehicle administrator in the state wherein the vehicle is registered. A vehicle owned by a nonresident and registered in a state not requiring insurance is exempt from this subsection.

Any police officer as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii), issuing a citation for any moving violation under W.S.

31-5-101

through

31-5-1402

or inspecting any vehicle, shall require the operator of any motor vehicle required to be registered to produce evidence of whether the operator or owner of the motor vehicle has in full force and effect a motor vehicle liability policy in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-405(b) or a bond in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi). If the operator cannot show proof of financial responsibility, the driver shall have seven (7) days to produce such proof. Any operator or owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered who is not able to demonstrate evidence of compliance with subsection (a) of this section may be charged with violating that subsection. Additionally, the judge may order any driver failing to produce proof of financial responsibility to pay restitution in accordance with W.S.

7-9-101

through

7-9-115

. The displaying or exhibiting of a validly issued insurance identification card as provided by W.S.

31-8-201

by an operator or owner of the motor vehicle constitutes compliance with this section. No operator or owner of a motor vehicle charged with violating this section shall be convicted if he produces in court one (1) of the following which was valid at the time of arrest or at the time the citation was issued:

A liability insurance policy previously issued to him;

Evidence of a bond on file with the department in amounts provided by W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi).

Upon receipt of a notice of a conviction under subsection (a) of this section, the department shall require the person convicted to file and maintain, for a three (3) year period, proof of financial responsibility as required by W.S.

31-9-401

through

31-9-414

. Failure to provide proof of financial responsibility within thirty (30) days after notification shall result in the suspension of the person’s driver’s license and nonresident operating privileges. The suspension shall remain in effect until the required proof of financial responsibility is received by the department.

This section does not apply to:

Self-insurers pursuant to W.S.

31-9-414

;

A vehicle owned by the United States government, any state or political subdivision thereof which is self-insured;

A vehicle meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-9-408

and

31-9-409

;

A commercial vehicle registered or proportionally registered in this and any other jurisdiction provided the vehicle is covered by a vehicle insurance policy complying with the laws of any other jurisdiction in which it is registered.

The department shall adopt by rule and regulation an on-line verification system for motor vehicle insurance or bond as required by this section, subject to the following:

The verification system shall be accessible through the Internet, World Wide Web or a similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system by authorized personnel of the department, the courts, law enforcement personnel, any other entities authorized by the department, and insurers authorized by the insurance department to issue the insurance required by this section;

The verification system shall be available twenty-four (24) hours a day to verify the insurance status of any vehicle registered in Wyoming through the vehicle’s identification number, policy number, registered owner’s name or other identifying characteristic or marker as prescribed by the department in its rules and regulations;

The verification system shall be installed and operational no later than July 1, 2008, following an appropriate testing period;

The department may contract with a private vendor to assist in establishing and maintaining the verification system, which may include a database of information reported to the department by insurers or may provide for direct inquiry of insurers’ records by authorized personnel;

The verification system shall include appropriate provisions, consistent with industry standards, to secure its data against unauthorized access and to maintain a record of all information requests;

Information contained in the verification system shall only be available for inspection under W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

as provided in W.S. 16-4-203(d)(x);

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and W.S. 31-8-203(a), any police officer as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii), during a traffic stop or accident investigation, may access information relating to a motor vehicle or an operator subject to the traffic stop, or to a motor vehicle or operator involved in an accident, from the on-line verification system to establish compliance with this section and to verify the current validity of the policy described on any insurance identification card issued pursuant to W.S.

31-8-201

and produced by the operator of a motor vehicle during the traffic stop or accident investigation.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1991, ch. 256, § 2; 1997, ch. 9, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2006, ch. 54, § 1; 2010, ch. 36, § 1; 2013 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 132, § 2, effective March 3, 2017; 2017 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For Insurance Code, see title 26.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (e).

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “currently required to be registered or which is required to be registered within a period of time” for “required to be registered” in the first sentence of (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 36 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “written” in the second and third sentence, and deleted “Effective January 1, 1993” in the fourth sentence in (b).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 152, § 1, in (a), added
“or, when applicable, in amounts as required by W.S. 31-20-107(b) and (c)” to the end of the first sentence, and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 132, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2017.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)”, substituted “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00)” for “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)”, deleted “On a second or subsequent violation of this subsection, the person may be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. In addition to the fine or imprisonment imposed” at the beginning of the third sentence, and made a related change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 54, § 2, appropriates two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the department of transportation for the purposes of this act.

Applicability to operator. —

An operator, as well as the owner, of a motor vehicle can be charged with violating the statutory requirement that owners maintain vehicle liability insurance coverage or bond pursuant to § 31-4-103(a); the legislature's failure to include the word “operator” within the text of subsection (a) does not affect the clear import of the statement in § 31-4-103(b), namely, that any operator or owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered does not demonstrate compliance with subsection (a) may be charged with violating that subsection. State v. Nelson, 2002 WY 99, 49 P.3d 185,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2002).

Minimum amount of coverage. —

Automobile liability insurance policies must provide at least the minimum amount of liability insurance coverage required under subsection (a), even for claims made by members of the insured's household. Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1997).

Household immunity clauses rendered void to extent of minimum liability coverage. —

Automobile public liability and property damage insurance policies issued in purported compliance with this section must, to the extent of the minimum liability security identified in §§ 31-9-405(b)(ii) and 31-9-102(a)(xi), cover all owners of motor vehicles who operate or permit the operation of their motor vehicles in Wyoming; consequently, household immunity clauses of such policies, to the extent of the aforesaid minimum requirements, are rendered void and of no force and effect. Allstate Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 672 P.2d 810,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1983).

Household exclusions or analogous exclusions are enforceable with respect to policy amounts in excess of the statutory minimum. Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1997).

Household exclusion clause. —

A “household exclusion” clause that reduced liability coverage for members of the insured's household to the “limits of liability required by law,” but not below, did not violate this section or the requirements of Wyoming public policy. Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1997).

No proof of insurance. —

District court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress marijuana that a state trooper found in the vehicle defendant had been driving because: (1) the incident began as a consensual encounter between the trooper and defendant, as the trooper stopped to render aid to defendant who was stuck in deep snow; (2) the trooper asked to see defendant's driver's license, which was wholly consistent with her duty as a police officer and did not invoke any constitutional protections; (3) the trooper subsequently determined that defendant had been driving without a license or insurance; (4) defendant consented to the trooper's search of the vehicle for insurance documentation; and (5) once the trooper entered the vehicle and smelled marijuana, she possessed the requisite probable cause to search the vehicle for contraband.
Shaw v. State, 2009 WY 18, 201 P.3d 1108,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Dyer, 19 F.3d 514, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 4890 (10th Cir. 1994).

Cited

in

Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “entering” or “alighting from” vehicle within meaning of insurance policy, or statute mandating insurance coverage, 59 ALR4th 149.

§ 31-4-104.
General penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this act for which no separate penalty is provided upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2020 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for violations of provisions regulating traffic on highways, see §

31-5-1201

.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted “imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both” at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-4-105.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-707

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning penalties or interest on the nonpayment of fees or taxes, see §

31-18-707

.